Utah statutes.
78B-6-406.   Supplemental relief.
Further relief based on a declaratory judgment or decree may be granted
whenever necessary or proper.  The application for further relief shall be by
petition to a court having jurisdiction to grant the relief.  If the
application is considered sufficient, the court shall, on reasonable notice,
require any adverse party, whose rights have been adjudicated by the
declaratory judgment or decree, to show cause why further relief should not be
immediately granted.
